src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-EVENWEAKSTEM-OTH
          +Sg+Gen:       K         ;
          +Sg+Acc:v      K         ;
          +Sg+Ine:n      K         ;
          +Sg+Ela:s      K         ;
          +Pl+Nom:       K         ;
          +Pl+Gen:j      K         ;
          +Pl+Acc:jt     K         ;
          +Pl+Ill:jda    K         ;
          +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:da    K         ;
          +Pl+Ine:jn     K         ;
   +Sg+Com+Use/NG:jn     K         ; ! ælojn!
          +Pl+Ela:js     K         ;
          +Pl+Com:j      K         ;
          +Sg+Gen:       NPxV      ; !
          +Sg+Acc:       NPxV      ; !
          +Sg+Ine:n%>    NPxC      ; !
          +Sg+Ela:st%>   NPxC      ; !
          +Pl+Nom:       NPxNomPlV ; !
          +Pl+Gen:j%>    NPxC      ; !
          +Pl+Acc:jd%>   NPxC      ; !
          +Pl+Ill:jdis%> NPxCs     ; !
          +Pl+Ine:jn%>   NPxC      ; !
          +Sg+Com:jn%>   NPxC      ; !
          +Pl+Ela:jst%>  NPxC      ; !
          +Pl+Com:j%>    NPxC      ; !
          +Sg+Abe:#dagi  K         ;
          +Sg+Abe:#dagá  K         ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:#tagá  K         ;
          +Pl+Abe:j#dagi K         ;
          +Pl+Abe:j#dagá K         ;
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:j#tagá K         ;

! ess & ill pl do not use Px that often, left out.
! But what about nom pl, gen pl?
! Spiik: Nominativ, genitiv och illativ pluralis antager sällan
! suffix och har därför ej medtagits i paradigmen.
! Here we thus wait for alternative input.

LEXICON N-EVENWEAKSTEM-SG-COM
          +Sg+Com:X5jn   K    ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg: elujn Note two dummies in a row!
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jna  K    ; !
   +Sg+Com+Use/NG:X5jn%> NPxC ; !

LEXICON N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj
  N-EVENWEAKSTEM-OTHadj    ;
  N-EVENWEAKSTEM-SG-COMadj ; ! separate bec of X5

LEXICON N-EVENWEAKSTEM-OTHadj
          +Sg+Gen:       ENDLEX    ;
          +Sg+Acc:v      ENDLEX    ;
          +Sg+Ine:n      ENDLEX    ;
          +Sg+Ela:s      ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Nom:       ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Gen:j      ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Acc:jt     ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Ill:jda    ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Ine:jn     ENDLEX    ;
          +Sg+Com:jn     ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Ela:js     ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Com:j      ENDLEX    ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:       NPxV      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc:       NPxV      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ine:n%>    NPxC      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ela:st%>   NPxC      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Nom:       NPxNomPlV ; !
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Gen:j%>    NPxC      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Acc:jd%>   NPxC      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Ill:jdis%> NPxCs     ; !
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Ine:jn%>   NPxC      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Com:jn%>   NPxC      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Ela:jst%>  NPxC      ; !
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Com:j%>    NPxC      ; !
          +Sg+Abe:#dagi  ENDLEX    ;
          +Sg+Abe:#dagá  ENDLEX    ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:#tagá  ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Abe:j#dagi ENDLEX    ;
          +Pl+Abe:j#dagá ENDLEX    ;
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:j#tagá ENDLEX    ;


! ess & ill pl do not use Px that often, left out.
! But what about nom pl, gen pl?
! Spiik: Nominativ, genitiv och illativ pluralis antager sällan
! suffix och har därför ej medtagits i paradigmen.
! Here we thus wait for alternative input.

LEXICON N-EVENWEAKSTEM-SG-COMadj
          +Sg+Com:X5jn   ENDLEX ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jna  ENDLEX ; !
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn%> NPxC   ; !

!! !Compound lexicas
! ----

! These compound sublexicas are too general: Some nouns have to be in specific cases when used as first compounds for certain stems. Kintel (2012) gives a brief overview over this distribution. The full picture is however not clear as thorough research has yet to be done. Examples: mánnágæhttje, but mánájskåvllå; vuosstáhievvil, not vuostájhievvil or vuostáhievvil.

LEXICON MUORRACmp
 +Cmp/SgNom:    R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:Q1  R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:Q1j R ;

LEXICON NOADECmp
 +Cmp/SgNom:    R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:    R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:Y6j R ;

LEXICON ACTORCmp
 +Cmp/SgNom:  R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:  R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:j R ;

LEXICON ODDCmp
 +Cmp/SgGen:a  R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:ij R ;



!! !!Odd-syllable stems
! ------------------

LEXICON ÅRES !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable C-final noun with CG, 2ndsyll vowchange. Long and short essive. Spiik A1
           +N:%>Q1 NE-ODDCASE        ; ! Q1 is general WeG
           +N:%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE       ; ! X5 is e:å and o:u
           +N:»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
           +N:»X5  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           +N:%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1 R                 ;
           +N:%>X5 AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: sjattos # Odd-syllable test
!!€ sjattos:            sjattos+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sjaddusis:          sjattos+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON GÁMAS !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable C-final noun with CG, no 2ndsyll vowchange (OBS: a does not change). Long and short essive. Spiik A2
           +N:%>Q1 NE-ODDCASE        ;
           +N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           +N:»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
           +N:»    DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           +N:%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1 R                 ;
           +N:     AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: sjábtjas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ sjábtjas:            sjábtjas+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sjábttjasis:          sjábtjas+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON GAHPER !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable C-final noun without cg, no vowchange, no short Ess. Spiik A3
           +N:%> N-ODDCASE         ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as gahper has no short Ess
           +N:%> OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           +N:»  DenominalNounsODD ;
           +N:»  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           +N:%> ODDCmp            ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%> R                 ;
           +N:   AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: stiebil # Odd-syllable test
!!€ stiebil:            stiebil+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ stiebilis:          stiebil+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BENA !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable V-final noun with cg, no vowchange. Long and short essive. Spiik 2a
           +N:%>X3 BENA-NE           ;
           +N:%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           +N:»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
           +N:»X5  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           +N:%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X3 R                 ;
           +N:%>X5 AHTÁ              ;
! X5 for vow change

!!€gt-norm: galma # Odd-syllable test
!!€ galma:            galma+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ galmmagis:          galma+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON SÅHKÅR !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable C-final noun with CG and 2ndsyll vowelchange. Has only long essive. Spiik 2b
           +N:%>Q1 N-ODDCASE         ; ! To Nom only, since SÅHKÅR has no short essive.
           +N:%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           +N:»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
           +N:»X5  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           +N:%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1 R                 ;
           +N:%>X5 AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: spiger # Odd-syllable test
!!€ spiger:            spiger+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ spihkáris:          spiger+N+Sg+Ela

!! !!Irregular stems
! _________

LEXICON SÁGE !!= @CODE@  gen: sáhkaha.  Presently only for "ságe". Long and short essive.
    +N+Sg+Nom:e%>Q1 K                 ;
           +N:ah%>  OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           +N:ah»   DenominalNounsODD ;
           +N:ah»   DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           +N:ah%>  ODDCmp            ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:e%>Q1 R                 ;
           +N:ah%>  AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: ságe # Odd-syllable test
!!€ ságe:            ságe+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sáhkahav:          ságe+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON BAVSEV !!= @CODE@  Ends on -v and last vowel changes to i: bavsev:baksIma. Not like gierkav gierkkAma and birev birEma.
    +N+Sg+Nom:e%>Q1v K                 ;
       +N+Ess:e%>Q1n K                 ;
           +N:im%>   OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           +N:im»    DenominalNounsODD ;
           +N:im»    DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           +N:im%>   ODDCmp            ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:e%>Q1v R                 ;
           +N:im%>   AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: sievtev # Odd-syllable test
!!€ sievtev:            sievtev+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ siektimis:          sievtev+N+Sg+Ela
