src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
bavsev+Sem/Body:baks BAVSEV ;
biebbmolågos+Sem/Act:biebbmo#låhkos ÅRES ;
biejvvevuojdas+Sem/Substnc:biejvve#vuojddas GÁMAS ;
biesta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Plant:biesstag8 BENA ; ! 
birem+Sem/Body:birem GAHPER ;
boagos+Sem/Prod-ling:boahkos ÅRES ; ! 
báhttjadarvas+Sem/Dummytag:báhttja#darvvas GÁMAS ;
bájta+Sem/Dummytag:bájttag8 BENA ;
båvtos+Sem/Dummytag:båktos ÅRES ;
dekuvdar+OLang/NOB+Sem/Obj-el:dekuvddar SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN
deppa+Sem/Dummytag:dæbbag8 BENA ;
dimbar+Sem/Mat:dimmbar SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN 
dramatihkkár+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dramatijkkár GAHPER ; ! LOAN
duogŋas+Sem/Obj:duoggŋas GÁMAS ;
duovda+Sem/Perc-phys:duovddag8 BENA ; ! 
dálvveåroj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Act_Plc:dálvve#årroh9 ÅRES ;
dårja+Sem/Act:doarjjag8 BENA ;
freelánsar+Sem/Hum:freelánssar GÁMAS ;
fáttar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:fáddar SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN 
genetihkkár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Domain:genetihkkár GAHPER ; ! LOAN
gerda+Sem/Amount:gærddag8 BENA ;
gieles+Sem/Semcon:gielles ÅRES ; ! 
gieras+Sem/Obj:gierras GÁMAS ;
goasos+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:goassos ÅRES ;
guobmebårjås+Sem/Obj-clo:guobme#bårjjås GÁMAS ;
gábbmismuodok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Feat-phys:gábbmis#muodog9 GAHPER ;
gáládakmuohta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:gáládak#muohttag8 BENA ;
gártjes+Sem/State:gárttjes ÅRES ; ! Also SARVES
gåntor+Sem/Dummytag:gånntor SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN
hiebdes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Feat-psych:hiebddes ÅRES ;
hijtam+Sem/Clthpart:hijtam GAHPER ;
hydrokortisonvuojdas+Sem/Substnc:hydro#kortison#vuojddas GÁMAS ;
jierekbiesta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Dummytag:jierek#biesstag8 BENA ;
jubmel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jubmel GAHPER ; ! 
katehtar+Sem/Obj:katehttar SÅHKÅR ;
káffasájger+Sem/Obj:káffa#sájgger9 ÅRES ;
lihtar+Err/Orth+Sem/Measr:lihtter SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN 
láhul+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:láhul GAHPER ;
lássanjuovtjav+Sem/Dummytag:lássa#njuoktjam9 GÁMAS ;
meierijjabuvta+Sem/Dummytag:meierijja#buktag8 BENA ;
miehtar+Area/SE+Sem/Measr:mehttar SÅHKÅR ; ! 
musur+Sem/Dummytag:musur GAHPER ;
máhttudakministar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:máhttudak#minisstar SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN
mánnábirás+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc-abstr:mánná#birras ÅRES ;
nielggebena+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:nielgge#bednag8 BENA ;
njejgas+Sem/Dummytag:njæjggas GÁMAS ; ! Njæjgas in Korhonen, but has to be e in nom, because æ is e in grade 2
oastok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:oastog9 GAHPER ;
oastos+Sem/Dummytag:oasstos ÅRES ;
plåstår+Area/SE+Sem/Clth-jewl:plåsstår SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN
rikkas+Sem/Geom_Obj:riggas GÁMAS ; ! 
rájan+Sem/Dummytag:rájan GAHPER ;
sebrudakdieda+Sem/Dummytag:sebrudak#diehtag8 BENA ;
sentilihtar+v2+Sem/Measr:senti#lijttar9 SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN
sievtev+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:siekt BAVSEV ;
sjoappkanuvman+Sem/Cat:sjoappka#nuvman GÁMAS ; ! LOAN
sjuomer+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sjuobmer9 ÅRES ;
skubmek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:skubmeg9 GAHPER ;
stáhtaministar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stáhta#minisstar SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN
sujtár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:sujtár GAHPER ;
svabás+Sem/Dummytag:svahpas GÁMAS ;
sádev+Sem/Dummytag:sád BAVSEV ;
ságe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sáhk SÁGE ;
såktåmuohta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:såktå#muohttag8 BENA ;
termus+Sem/Dummytag:tærmmus SÅHKÅR ;
tjerasmiedoj+Sem/Dummytag:tjeras#miehtoh9 ÅRES ;
tjiergam+Sem/Plant:tjierggam GÁMAS ;
tjuktjehábak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:tjuktje#hábag9 GAHPER ;
tjála+Sem/Txt:tjállag8 BENA ; ! 
urtas+Sem/Dummytag:urttas GÁMAS ;
uvsuk+Sem/Dummytag:uvsug9 GAHPER ;
varresvuodaregistar+Sem/Plc-abstr:varresvuoda#regisstar SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN
vedur+Sem/Dummytag:vehtur9 ÅRES ;
vuorrolávla+Sem/Prod-audio:vuorro#lávllag8 BENA ;
vátjav+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:váhtjam9 GÁMAS ;
árvos+Sem/Dummytag:árvvos ÅRES ;
árvvopáhper+Sem/Txt:árvvo#páhpper SÅHKÅR ; ! LOAN
åvddåtjála+Sem/Dummytag:åvddå#tjállag8 BENA ;
æhpár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:æhpár GAHPER ; ! 
